District of Columbia statutes.
34-1113

Accounts to be closed annually; verified balance sheet to be filed with Commission; copy of balance sheet to Congress.

The accounts shall be closed annually on the 31st day of December, and a balance sheet of that date promptly taken therefrom. On or before the 1st day of February following such balance sheet, together with such other information as the Commission shall prescribe, verified by an owner or officer of the public utility, shall be filed with the Commission, and a copy thereof transmitted to Congress.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 979, ch. 150, § 8, par. 14
1981 Ed., § 43-513.
1973 Ed., § 43-313.